Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-968
School-based health centers; School
Health Center Advisory Council; members.

(1) To ensure that the interests
of the school district, community, and health care provider are reflected
within the policies, procedures, and scope of services of school-based health
centers, each school district shall establish a School Health Center Advisory
Council for each school in the district hosting a school-based health center.

(2) The
School Health Center Advisory Council shall include:

(a) At least one
representative of the school administration or school district administration;

(b)
At least one representative of the sponsoring facility; and

(c)
At least one parent recommended by a school administrator or school district
administrator and approved by a majority vote of the school board. Any parent
serving on a School Health Center Advisory Council shall have at least one
child enrolled in the school through which the school-based health center
is organized.

(3) If another institution or organization sponsors the school-based
health center, at least one representative of each sponsoring institution
or organization shall be included on the School Health Center Advisory Council.

(4)
School Health Center Advisory Councils may also include students enrolled
in the school district through which the school-based health center is organized.
Any such students must be appointed by a school administrator or school district
administrator.

Laws 2010, LB1106, § 4.